Hawaii statutes.
§656-1 Certain contracts, when actionable.
No action shall be brought and maintained in any of the following cases:

(1) To charge a personal representative, upon any
special promise to answer for damages out of the personal representative's own
estate;

(2) To charge any person upon any special promise to
answer for the debt, default, or misdoings of another;

(3) To charge any person, upon an agreement made in
consideration of marriage;

(4) Upon any contract for the sale of lands,
tenements, or hereditaments, or of any interest in or concerning them;

(5) Upon any agreement that is not to be performed
within one year from the making thereof;

(6) To charge any person upon any agreement
authorizing or employing an agent or broker to purchase or sell real estate for
compensation or commission;

(7) To charge the estate of any deceased person upon
any agreement which by its terms is not to be performed during the lifetime of
the promisor, or, in the case of agreements made prior to July 1, 1977, of an
agreement to devise or bequeath any property, or to make any provision for any
person by will; or

(8) To charge any financial institution upon an
agreement by the financial institution to lend money or extend credit in an
amount greater than $50,000;

unless the promise, contract, or agreement, upon
which the action is brought, or some memorandum or note thereof, is in writing,
and is signed by the party to be charged therewith, or by some person thereunto
by the party in writing lawfully authorized. The term "financial
institution" used in [paragraph] (8) means an institution domiciled in
this State whose deposits are federally insured or a financial institution
which is examined and supervised by the commissioner of financial institutions.
[CC 1859, §1053; am L 1923, c 5, §1; RL 1925, §2665; am L 1929, c 21, §1; RL
1935, §3900; RL 1945, §8721; RL 1955, §190-1; HRS §656-1; am L 1976, c 200, pt
of §1; am L 1977, c 144, §63; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 119, §1]

Cross References

Oral lease of real property not exceeding one year, see
§666-4.

Case Notes

Partnership agreement has to be in writing where the
partnership is formed for purpose of transferring a specific piece of land.
680 F. Supp. 1438 (1988).

Statute of frauds must be pleaded as affirmative defense
under HRCP rule 8(c). 45 H. 1, 361 P.2d 374 (1961).

Where no real property interest was transferred to owner by
virtue of owner's redemption of property at IRS tax sale, statute of frauds
inapplicable. 84 H. 360 (App.), 934 P.2d 1 (1997).

Where sole proprietorship accepted the benefits of the
telephone and other services provided by phone company in substantial reliance
on sole proprietorship's oral agreement to pay for services executed, sole
proprietorship and its sole proprietor were liable for the cost of those
services. 98 H. 462 (App.), 50 P.3d 431 (2002).

Par. (2). Plaintiff health care provider's claim for breach
of alleged oral contract not barred by statute of frauds, where, by orally
agreeing to cover insured's treatment, defendants were clearly advancing their
own business purpose of maintaining the business relationship with their
insured and preventing an escalation of costs with plaintiff. 58 F. Supp. 2d
1162 (1999).

Promise to pay for goods delivered to another is an original
promise not within statute. 13 H. 212 (1900); 34 H. 875, 877 (1939).

Promise to pay debt of another under certain circumstances
not within statute. 17 H. 32, 38 (1905).

Promise to save maker of note harmless is original promise.
19 H. 554 (1909).

To charge person for debt, default or misdoings of another.
Statute of frauds applies only to oral promises made to a person to whom
another is answerable. 35 H. 579, 581 (1940).

Promise to pay debt of another under certain circumstances
not within statute. Collateral and original promise, discussed. 2 H. App.
679, 639 P.2d 426 (1982).

Par. (4). Insufficiency of memorandum. 206 F.2d 892 (1953).

The mortgage of owners who own property being auctioned at a
foreclosure auction was an agreement concerning the transfer of an interest in
land and subject to the statute of frauds; additionally, the agreement in which
defendant loan servicer agreed not to exercise its rights under the owners'
mortgage to foreclose in light of their default and to allow owners to make
lower monthly mortgage payments, effectively extending the term of their loan,
was also an agreement concerning a further transfer of interest in the land and
thus subject to the statute of frauds. 873 F. Supp. 2d 1268 (2012).

Contract for sale of lands or interest therein. Sale under
order of court not within statute. 3 H. 705 (1876).

Signature by "X" held sufficient. 4 H. 133 (1878).

Seal not essential to validity of instrument for conveyance
of land. 4 H. 459 (1882). See 4 H. 515 (1882).

Necessary elements constituting a memorandum. 4 H. 593, 598
(1882).

Possession of land in buyer, when sufficient to take case out
of statute. 4 H. 593 (1882).

Improvements as removing transaction from statute. 4 H. 637
(1883).

Gift of land held contract within statute. 6 H. 160 (1875).

Special circumstances taking sale of house out. 7 H. 755
(1889).

Agreement to sell land must be in writing. 8 H. 649 (1882).

Specific performance of oral contract on ground of part
performance. 9 H. 117 (1893).

Signature of defendant alone, whether vendor or vendee, is
sufficient. 9 H. 434 (1894); 13 H. 307 (1901); 29 H. 669 (1927); 34 H. 651
(1938).

Agreement of A and B that A purchase at auction for joint
account of both within. 10 H. 395 (1896).

Contract for lease or sublease within. 11 H. 181 (1897).

Oral acceptance by A of written offer signed by B sufficient
for specific performance against B. 13 H. 92 (1900); 13 H. 471, 475 (1901).

Memorandum may be in form of one or more receipts or
letters. 13 H. 392 (1901).

Parol partition of land not within. 16 H. 294 (1904).

Bond for a deed sufficient to satisfy statute. 18 H. 602,
609 (1908).

Easement may not be created by parol. 21 H. 751 (1913).

Contract for sale of interest in land includes leases. 23 H.
706, 709 (1917).

Under certain circumstances parol agreement to grant lease
enforceable in equity. 25 H. 494 (1920).

Oral agreement to sublet. 31 H. 799 (1931).

Part performance of oral agreement to sublet as taking case
out of statute of frauds. 31 H. 799 (1931).

Parol agreement to cancel written lease. 34 H. 1 (1936).

Sufficiency of a memorandum of contract for sale of lands.
42 H. 304 (1958).

Question of separate writings constituting the memorandum;
check as memorandum. 42 H. 485 (1958).

Mutual restrictions on land use similar to easements and
statute applies. 44 H. 235, 353 P.2d 1007 (1960).

When memorandum may be proved as a lost document. 45 H. 1,
361 P.2d 374 (1961).

Requirement that authorization be in writing if the
instrument is signed by another, referred to. 50 H. 189, 436 P.2d 207 (1967).
See 5 H. 650 (1886).

Oral contract becomes enforceable if there has been part
performance. 50 H. 641, 447 P.2d 667 (1968).

When two or more writings, signed and unsigned, may be
considered together. 54 H. 433, 508 P.2d 1051 (1973).

Parol contract to convey real property must be established by
clear and convincing evidence; part performance to take it out of statute
requires similar proof. 58 H. 40, 564 P.2d 144 (1977).

Appellees were bound by the terms of agreement,
notwithstanding the statute of frauds, where although there was a written
agreement signed by the parties' attorneys, there was no writing authorizing
appellees' attorney to enter into agreement. 78 H. 76, 890 P.2d 313 (1995).

Sufficiency of DROA (deposit receipt, offer and acceptance
form). 5 H. App. 581, 704 P.2d 930 (1985).

Par. (5). Alleged loan agreement between decedent and
defendant not within statute of frauds where it was possible for the loan
agreement to have been performed within a year, and defendant paid interest and
part principal on the loan; to allow defendant to now negate the agreement
would serve as an injustice on plaintiff decedent's estate. 731 F. Supp. 2d
1000 (2010).

Agreement to take charge of a plantation for three years is
within. 2 H. 753 (1865).

Agreement not to be performed within one year. Agreement to
lease land for cultivation treated as a license. 3 H. 306 (1871) (single
justice).

If contract could have been performed within a year although
in fact it was not, it is excepted from the statute. 5 H. 67 (1883). See 35
H. 402, 416 (1940).

Contract contemplating continuous telephone service for years
is within. 6 H. 589 (1885) (single justice).

Enforcement by virtue of reliance on oral contract. 52 H.
29, 469 P.2d 177 (1970).

Section does not bar a party from proving the existence of
the other party's alleged oral promissory representations in a fraudulent
inducement defense. 7 H. App. 473, 778 P.2d 721 (1989).

Par. (7). Charging estate of decedent on agreement to be
performed after death, to devise property, or make provisions by will.
Concerning oral contract to devise land with part performance. 26 H. 369
(1922); 27 H. 457 (1923).

Oral contract to make a will must be established by clear and
convincing evidence, and proof of part performance to take case out of statute
must be established by similar evidence. 58 H. 4, 563 P.2d 391 (1977).

Enforcement by virtue of reliance on oral contract. 66 H.
451, 666 P.2d 582 (1983).

Exceptions to statute. Plaintiffs failed to present clear
and convincing evidence of existence and terms of alleged oral option
contract. 906 F. Supp. 1377 (1995).

Decedent's alleged testamentary gift of loan forgiveness must
be in writing in order to be operative as required by this section and
§560:2-502(b); no exception to the writing requirement for testamentary gifts.
731 F. Supp. 2d 1000 (2010).

Resulting trust may be established by parol evidence; not
within statute. 2 H. 563 (1862); 6 H. 489 (1884); 34 H. 363 (1937). See 2 H.
662 (1863).

Third section English Statute, not enacted. 3 H. 274
(1871). See 5 H. 600 (1886).

Parol assignment of mortgage where note and deed endorsed. 5
H. 397 (1885); 6 H. 114 (1873).

Trust in personalty created by parol. 5 H. 497 (1885).

New agreement to pay interest on interest secured by mortgage
not within statute. 8 H. 742 (1892).

Concerning waiver of statute. 32 H. 183 (1931).

Showing of forebearance, in and of itself, not sufficient
part performance to remove oral contract from operation of statute. 58 H. 4,
563 P.2d 391 (1977); 4 H. App. 333, 666 P.2d 617 (1983).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next